Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-568
Cities and villages; vacancy; how filled.

(1) If any vacancy occurs in the office of city council member or mayor of a city of the metropolitan class, the vacancy shall be filled as provided by local law.

(2) The city council of a city of the primary class may provide for filling any vacancies that occur in any elective office by appointment by the mayor, with the advice and consent of the council, to hold office until the next general city election. In case of vacancy in the office of mayor of a city of the primary class or his or her absence or disability, the president of the council shall exercise the powers and duties of the office until such vacancy is filled or disability removed or, in case of temporary absence, until the mayor returns, and such acting mayor shall perform such other duties as may be required by law.

(3) In a city of the first class except a city which has adopted the commissioner or city manager plan of government, any vacancy on the council resulting from causes other than expiration of the term shall be filled by appointment by the mayor with the consent of the city council to hold office for the remainder of the term. When there is a vacancy in the office of the mayor in a city of the first class, the president of the city council shall serve as mayor for the unexpired term. In case of any temporary absence or disability on the part of the mayor, the president of the council shall exercise the powers and duties of the office of mayor until such disability is removed, or in case of temporary absence until the mayor returns, and shall perform such other duties as may be required by law.

(4) Any vacancy on the city council of a city of the second class shall be filled as provided in section 32-569. In the case of any vacancy in the office of mayor, or in case of his or her disability or absence, the president of the council shall exercise the office of mayor for the unexpired term, until such disability is removed, or in case of temporary absence, until the mayor returns. If the president of the council assumes the office of mayor for the unexpired term, there shall be a vacancy on the council.

(5) A vacancy on the board of trustees of a village shall be filled as provided in section 32-569, except that the board of trustees of a village situated in more than one county shall have power to fill by appointment any vacancy that may occur in their number.

(6) If any vacancy occurs in the office of council member in a city under the commission plan of government, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in section 32-569. If an incumbent in a city under the commission plan of government files for a city office other than the office he or she holds, the office he or she holds shall become vacant as of the date of the commencement of the term of the office for which he or she has filed. If such vacancy results in an unexpired term, such vacancy shall be filled by election for the remainder of the unexpired term. In a city under the commission plan of government, the vice president of the city council shall perform the duties of the mayor of the city in the absence or inability of the mayor to serve. If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor by death or otherwise, the vice president shall perform the duties of mayor of the city until such time as the council shall fill such vacancy, which shall be done at the first council meeting after such vacancy occurs or as soon thereafter as may be practicable.

(7) If a vacancy occurs in the office of council member in a city under a city manager plan, a successor council member shall be elected at the next regular city election to serve for the remainder of the term, except that a majority of the remaining members of the council shall appoint a registered voter to serve as council member until the successor is so elected and has qualified. If the council members are elected by ward, the council member elected or appointed to fill the vacancy shall be a registered voter of the ward in which the vacancy exists. If for any reason the seats of one-half or more of the members of the council become vacant, the Secretary of State shall conduct a special election to fill the vacancies for the unexpired portion of each term. A vacancy in any office to which the council elects shall be filled by the council for the unexpired term.

(8) Vacancies in city offices in any city under home rule charter shall be filled as provided in the home rule charter.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 164;

Laws 1997, LB 734, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 53;

Laws 2006, LB 1067, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB878, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 36.